Utah statutes.
31A-35-403.   Exemptions to licensing requirements.

This chapter does not affect the negotiation through a licensed producer for, or the execution or delivery of, an undertaking of bail executed by an insurer for its insured under a policy of automobile insurance or of liability insurance upon the automobile of the insured.

